trunk/resultats/catalan.dic
abstencionisme/EVY
acamussi/D
acció/GVY
aclamada/EVY
acredita/D
aculi/DEVY
adjudicació/GVY
adulterina/EVY
aerobús/IVY
afeccione/D
afinació/GVY
afollament/EVY
agafa-sants/IVY
agrega/D
agrologia/EVY
aiguamoix/IVY
alacrà/GVY
alauita/EVY
alfarràs/IVYZ
alicíclica/EVY
alimentació/GVY
alleugereixi/D
alumna/EVY
amantbraç/IVY
ambrita/EVY
ambó/GVY
amoneda/D
amplària/EVY
anemoscopi/EVY
antelació/GVY
antevigília/EVY
antixocs/IVY
antonina/EVY
apanyusse/D
apesarada/EVY
apreciació/GVY
apropinqua/D
apunyegada/EVY
arboç/IVY
arremesa/EVY
arreste/D
arrià/GHVY
arç/IVY
assoldament/EVY
assole/D
atans/IVY
aurificació/GVY
autentique/D
autobús/IVY
autoimmunitària/EVY
autoregressió/GVY
avenç/IVY
balaix/I
baldaquí/G
balot/E
banyegue/D
bardaix/I
batà/G
benzina/E
bes/I
bibliobús/I
biquars/I
birbe/D
bisecció/G
bocadolç/I
bolcant/CE
borà/G
boç/I
brandisca/D
brotam/E
bufaforats/I
buratí/G
cabeç/I
caciqueja/D
caixot/E
calamars/I
calculació/G
calís/I
capció/G
capellera/E
capicula/D
capmàs/I
carcatràs/I
carilló/G
carés/I
caseriu/E
cató/G
cavallone/D
cens/I
cercapoals/I
cianina/E
cicadofití/G
civilització/G
coaccioni/D
cobejança/E
coeducació/G
colgafocs/I
col·lusió/G
començ/I
compartimenti/D
comprensió/G
compta-revolucions/I
concertisme/E
condó/G
congele/D
consecució/G
consens/I
contorsió/G
contraforadi/D
contrastable/E
contumaç/I
convicció/G
correcamins/I
correlació/G
corriolege/D
craniometria/E
crisè/G
cruix/CIU
curs/I
càpsida/E
da/D
dalí/G
defeminació/G
deix/I
delinqueixi/D
demarcació/G
desacceleració/G
desagrade/D
desagregable/E
desatendre/D
descens/I
descolla/D
descoloració/G
desembarasse/D
desemperesesqui/D
desencossie/D
desenlluerne/D
desestanqui/D
desglaç/I
deshidrogenació/G
desinforma/D
desnasalització/G
desocupa/D
dessacralització/G
dessoldi/D
devasti/D
diacronia/E
dialització/G
dioxà/G
discurs/I
dissuadeixi/D
dissuasió/G
dolcesa/E
dors/I
dotació/G
eix/IJVY
eixarcola/D
eixaugada/EVY
elaboració/GVY
embasti/D
embrió/GVY
emmagatzemada/EVY
emmalesa/D
empata/D
empatx/IVY
emproa/D
encarrega/D
encartament/EVY
encorre/DZ
encís/IVYZ
enferritge/D
engaliada/EVY
enganyabadocs/IVY
engelabrisca/D
enllaç/IVY
enllistona/D
ensabi/D
entaforament/EVY
entoixi/D
entremès/IJVY
entropesse/D
enturió/GVY
episodiada/EVY
erre/D
escabetxe/D
escanyacavalls/IVY
escanyagossos/EVY
escarpí/GVY
escintil·le/D
escorç/IVY
escòrrec/EVY
esfereïsca/D
esmorre/D
espantallops/IVY
espermatangi/EVY
esperó/GVY
espigueja/D
establisca/D
estantolada/EVY
estassabarders/IVY
estellicó/GVY
estrinxola/D
estíptica/EVY
eutrofització/GVY
excogitació/GVY
exhibeixi/D
expiació/GVY
exponent/EVY
extremunció/GVY
fal·laç/I
fantasia/DE
farratjó/G
fenaleda/E
fes/CIJ
fi/GH
flamereja/D
flexió/G
florent/E
fracture/D
fricció/G
fris/I
frisor/E
garanteixi/D
garrafa/E
garritx/I
gaó/G
glotis/E
gotegi/D
gratabous/I
greixelló/G
guardacaps/I
guiatge/E
handicapi/D
heteronexual/EVY
hiperó/GVY
hipobromós/IVY
horroritzada/EVY
impregne/D
impressió/GY
inaplicable/EVY
incapaç/IVY
inducció/GY
inicie/D
iniquitat/EY
instigació/GY
invitació/GY
invoca/D
ismaïlisme/EVY
jaquès/I
leninista/E
lexicalització/G
lladronege/D
llassís/I
llevaneu/E
llonzí/G
lluís/I
luxi/D
magreta/E
mancús/I
manxó/G
manyegui/D
martensita/E
mas/I
matx/EI
mereixi/D
messies/I
mestraló/G
metacentre/E
modalitzador/E
molló/G
moraduix/I
moralitze/D
mundanal/E
natró/G
neutralista/E
nidifique/D
nus/I
obstrucció/GVY
ocasionalista/EVY
omple/DZ
orbada/EVY
paganització/G
pagellera/E
panteixa/D
papadiners/I
parraca/E
passacamins/I
peix/CIS
pelleró/G
pentatleta/E
peptitza/D
pes/I
pigmentació/G
pilar/E
pilone/D
pitjapapers/I
plusmarca/E
politjó/G
pol·luïsca/D
portaaeronaus/I
portaescuradents/I
postulantat/E
prefixació/G
presidesqui/D
procaç/I
pronominalització/G
proteccionisme/E
proveesqui/D
quarterola/E
quelació/G
rapissi/D
ras/IJ
reactant/E
recapitulació/G
recarrega/D
reeduqui/D
reesmerç/I
refrigeració/G
remembrament/E
rentacaps/I
reompla/D
replà/G
repòs/I
revellí/G
reverdesqui/D
rigidesa/E
ros/BI
sacaroide/E
salmó/G
sandvitx/I
sedassi/D
seguici/E
serafí/G
simplicitat/E
sis/I
sobretensió/G
soplugi/D
sorícid/E
sudació/G
tabolaire/E
tallacigars/I
tapapunts/I
tatxolí/G
teleprocés/I
tempra/D
tendur/E
tità/G
tocada/E
torcamans/I
travacavalls/I
traveli/D
traïció/G
trencanous/I
trencant/CE
troleibús/I
turpitud/E
undecà/GVY
vellut/E
veraç/I
verifiqui/D
vibració/G
vituperi/DE
xoriç/I
xunt/E
zonificació/G
